District of Columbia statutes.
29-411.04

Stay of proceedings.

If the nonprofit corporation commences an inquiry into the allegations made in the demand or complaint, the Superior Court may stay any derivative proceeding for such period as the court considers appropriate.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-411.08.